Massachusetts, session 194th, S891.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 16FF the following section:-
Section 16GG. (a) There shall be established a primary care workforce development and
loan forgiveness grant program at community health centers for the purpose of enhancing
recruitment and retention of primary care physicians, other clinicians, bachelor’s degree-level
mental health and primary care professionals including, but not limited to, community health
workers, recovery coaches and family partners, as well as all other non-clinician staff at
community health centers throughout the Commonwealth. Priority shall be given to clinicians
and bachelor’s degree-level mental health and primary care professionals. The grant program
of 2

shall be administered by the Executive Office of Health and Human Services, provided, that the
office may contract with an organization to administer the grant program. This program shall
ensure the continuation of state-level loan repayment for clinicians at community health centers
including but not limited to those programs established by Chapter 102 of the acts of 2021,
reserve 1599-2026.
(b) The program shall prioritize the recruitment and retention of a culturally, ethnically
and linguistically diverse workforce; provided further, that to be eligible for loan repayment
assistance under this item, an individual shall: (i) work in a community health center; (ii) have
outstanding educational debt; (iii) not participate in any other loan repayment program; and (iv)
be required to enter into a contract with the commonwealth for not less than 4 years; provided
further, that the amount of assistance per individual shall be pro-rated for individuals working on
a part-time basis; provided further, that the executive office shall promulgate regulations for the
administration and enforcement of the loan repayment assistance program under this item which
shall include penalties and repayment procedures if a participating individual fails to comply
with the program requirements;
(c) The program shall be funded through expenditures from the Behavioral Health and
Community-Based Primary Care Reserve established in section 2A of chapter 102 of the acts of
2021.
of 2